Washington statutes.
RCW 36.56.020

Ordinance or resolution of intention to assume rights, powers, functions, and obligations—Adoption—Publication—Hearing.

The assumption of the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of a metropolitan municipal corporation may be initiated by the adoption of an ordinance or a resolution, as the case may be, by the county legislative authority indicating its intention to conduct a hearing concerning assumption of such rights, powers, functions, and obligations. In the event the county legislative authority adopts such an ordinance or a resolution of intention, such ordinance or resolution shall set a time and place at which it will consider the proposed assumption of the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of the metropolitan municipal corporation, and shall state that all persons interested may appear and be heard. Such ordinance or resolution of intention shall be published for at least four times during the four weeks next preceding the scheduled hearing in newspapers of daily general circulation printed or published in said county.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 277 s 2.]